Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202660-103
All-terrain vehicle, defined.

All-terrain vehicle means any motorized off-highway device which (1) is fifty inches or less in width, (2) travels on three or more nonhighway tires, and (3) is designed for operator use only with no passengers or is specifically designed by the original manufacturer for the operator and one passenger.

Laws 2005, LB 276, § 3;

Laws 2014, LB814, § 3;

Laws 2025, LB98, § 1.